Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-410
Juvenile absconding; authority to apprehend.

(1) Any peace officer or direct care staff member of the Office of Juvenile Services has the authority to apprehend and detain a juvenile who has absconded or is attempting to abscond from commitment to the Office of Juvenile Services and shall cause the juvenile to be returned to the youth rehabilitation and treatment center or an appropriate juvenile detention facility or staff secure juvenile facility.

(2) For purposes of this section, direct care staff member means any staff member charged with the day-to-day care and supervision of juveniles at a youth rehabilitation and treatment center or security staff who has received training in apprehension techniques and procedures.

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 42;

Laws 2013, LB561, § 31;

Laws 2020, LB1188, § 8.